Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.190

State treasurer's service fund—Creation—Purpose.

There is hereby created a fund within the state treasury to be known as the "state treasurer's service fund." Such fund shall be used solely for the payment of costs and expenses incurred in the operation and administration of the state treasurer's office.

Moneys shall be allocated monthly and placed in the state treasurer's service fund equivalent to a maximum of one percent of the trust and treasury average daily cash balances from the earnings generated under the authority of RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.080 other than earnings generated from investment of balances in funds and accounts specified in RCW 43.79A.040(4)(c). The allocation shall precede the distribution of the remaining earnings as prescribed under RCW 43.79A.040 and 43.84.092. The state treasurer shall establish a uniform allocation rate for all funds and accounts; except that the state treasurer may negotiate a different allocation rate with any state agency that has independent authority over funds not statutorily required to be held in the state treasury or in the custody of the state treasurer. In no event shall the rate be less than the actual costs incurred by the state treasurer's office. If no rate is separately negotiated, the default rate for any funds held shall be the rate set for funds held pursuant to statute.

The legislature may direct the state treasurer to make transfers of money in the state treasurer's service fund to the state general fund.

[ 2022 c 157 s 13; 2021 c 334 s 969; 2019 c 415 s 962; 2017 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 966; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 4 s 953; 2013 2nd sp.s. c 4 s 973; 2011 1st sp.s. c 50 s 941; 2010 c 222 s 3; 2009 c 564 s 926; 2008 c 329 s 912; 2005 c 518 s 925; 2003 1st sp.s. c 25 s 916; 1991 sp.s. c 13 s 83; 1985 c 405 s 506; 1973 c 27 s 2.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.

Effective date—2019 c 415: See note following RCW 28B.20.476.

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 1: See note following RCW 43.41.455.

Effective dates—2015 3rd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.15.069.

Effective dates—2013 2nd sp.s. c 4: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Effective dates—2011 1st sp.s. c 50: See note following RCW 15.76.115.

Intent—2010 c 222: See note following RCW 43.08.150.

Effective date—2009 c 564: See note following RCW 2.68.020.

Severability—Effective date—2008 c 329: See notes following RCW 28B.105.110.

Effective date—2005 c 518: See note following RCW 28A.600.110.

Severability—Effective date—2003 1st sp.s. c 25: See notes following RCW 19.28.351.

Effective dates—Severability—1991 sp.s. c 13: See notes following RCW 18.08.240.

Severability—1985 c 405: See note following RCW 9.46.100.